tests/радио.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах радио":
    радио<n><nom> :  радио 
    радио<n><gen> :  радион 
    радио<n><dat> :  радиона 
    радио<n><loc> :  радиора 
    радио<n><abl> :  радиоран 
    радио<n><ins> :  радиопа 
    радио<n><abe> :  радиосӑр 
    радио<n><ben> :  радиошӑн
    радио<n><px1sg><nom> :  радиом 
    радио<n><px1sg><gen> :  радиомӑн 
    радио<n><px1sg><dat> :  радиома 
    радио<n><px1sg><loc> :  радиомра 
    радио<n><px1sg><abl> :  радиомран 
    радио<n><px1sg><ins> :  радиомпа 
    радио<n><px1sg><abe> :  радиомсӑр 
    радио<n><px1sg><ben> :  радиомшӑн
    радио<n><px2sg><nom> :  радю 
    радио<n><px2sg><gen> :  радюн 
    радио<n><px2sg><dat> :  радиюна 
    радио<n><px2sg><loc> :  радюнта 
    радио<n><px2sg><abl> :  радюнтан 
    радио<n><px2sg><ins> :  радюпа 
    радио<n><px2sg><abe> :  радюсӑр 
    радио<n><px2sg><ben> :  радюшӑн
    радио<n><px3sp><nom> :  радиовӗ 
    радио<n><px3sp><gen> :  радиовӗн 
    радио<n><px3sp><dat> :  радиовӗне 
    радио<n><px3sp><loc> :  радиовӗнче 
    радио<n><px3sp><abl> :  радиовӗнчен 
    радио<n><px3sp><ins> :  радиовӗпе 
    радио<n><px3sp><abe> :  радиовӗсӗр 
    радио<n><px3sp><ben> :  радиовӗшӗн
    радио<n><px1pl><nom> :  радиомӑр 
    радио<n><px1pl><gen> :  радиомӑрӑн 
    радио<n><px1pl><dat> :  радиомӑра 
    радио<n><px1pl><loc> :  радиомӑрта 
    радио<n><px1pl><abl> :  радиомӑртан 
    радио<n><px1pl><ins> :  радиомӑрпа 
    радио<n><px1pl><abe> :  радиомӑрсӑр 
    радио<n><px1pl><ben> :  радиомӑршӑн
    радио<n><px2pl><nom> :  радиӑр 
    радио<n><px2pl><gen> :  радиӑрӑн 
    радио<n><px2pl><dat> :  радиӑра 
    радио<n><px2pl><loc> :  радиӑрта 
    радио<n><px2pl><abl> :  радиӑртан 
    радио<n><px2pl><ins> :  радиӑрпа 
    радио<n><px2pl><abe> :  радиӑрсӑр 
    радио<n><px2pl><ben> :  радиӑршӑн
    радио<n><pl><nom> :  радиосем 
    радио<n><pl><gen> :  радиосен 
    радио<n><pl><dat> :  радиосене 
    радио<n><pl><loc> :  радиосенче 
    радио<n><pl><abl> :  радиосенчен 
    радио<n><pl><ins> :  радиосемпе 
    радио<n><pl><abe> :  радиосемсӗр 
    радио<n><pl><ben> :  радиосемшӗн
    радио<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  радиомсем 
    радио<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  радиомсен 
    радио<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  радиомсене 
    радио<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  радиомсенче 
    радио<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  радиомсенчен 
    радио<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  радиомсемпе 
    радио<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  радиомсемсӗр 
    радио<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  радиомсемшӗн
    радио<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  радюсем 
    радио<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  радюсен 
    радио<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  радюсене 
    радио<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  радюсенче 
    радио<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  радюсенчен 
    радио<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  радюсемпе 
    радио<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  радюсемсӗр 
    радио<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  радюсемшӗн
    радио<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  радиовӗсем 
    радио<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  радиовоӗсен 
    радио<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  радиовӗсене 
    радио<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  радиовӗсенче 
    радио<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  радиовӗсенчен 
    радио<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  радиовӗсемпе 
    радио<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  радиовӗсемсӗр 
    радио<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  радиовӗсемшӗн
    радио<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  радиомӑрсем 
    радио<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  радиомӑрсен 
    радио<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  радиомӑрсене 
    радио<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  радиомӑрсенче 
    радио<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  радиомӑрсенчен 
    радио<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  радиомӑрсемпе 
    радио<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  радиомӑрсемсӗр 
    радио<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  радиомӑрсемшӗн
    радио<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  радиӑрсем 
    радио<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  радиӑрсен 
    радио<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  радиӑрсене 
    радио<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  радиӑрсенче 
    радио<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  радиӑрсенчен 
    радио<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  радиӑрсемпе 
    радио<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  радиӑрсемсӗр 
    радио<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  радиӑрсемшӗн
